Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 2

Unlawful Operation of Aircraft

42-1-201. Operating or acting as crewmember of aircraft following alcohol or drug use — Penalty.

As used in this part, “crewmember” means any person performing or assigned to perform any duty in a civil aircraft during the time that the aircraft is undergoing pre-flight inspection, boarding or carrying passengers or crew or any time the aircraft is under power or in flight.

It is an offense for any person to operate or attempt to operate, or act or attempt to act, as a crewmember of any civil aircraft:

Within eight (8) hours after consumption of any alcoholic beverage;

While under the influence of alcohol;

While using any substance that affects the crewmember's faculties in any way contrary to safety; or

With four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more by weight of alcohol in the crewmember's blood.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor. In addition to the authorized punishment for a Class A misdemeanor, the court may prohibit the defendant from operating or acting as a crewmember on an aircraft for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.1 (Williams, § 2726.62); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-112; Acts 1994, ch. 797, § 1.

Cross-References. Aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

Aircraft piracy, first degree murder, §39-13-202.

Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Aviation fuel, §67-6-217.

Aviation fuel, title 67, ch. 4, part 27.

Classification and Assessment if utilities and carriers, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Confiscation of aircraft in drug control, title 53, ch. 11, part 2.

Conveyances subject to forfeiture, §40-33-101.

Disorderly conduct, title 39, ch. 17, part 3.

Exemptions from sales and use tax, title 67, ch. 6, part 3.

Goods subject to forfeiture and seizure in drug control, §53-11-451.

Liens against aircraft, title 66, ch. 19, part 3.

Military property, title 58, ch. 1, part 5.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Procedure for seizing contraband alcoholic beverages, §57-9-202.

Procedure for seizing contraband tobacco, §67-4-1021.

Standards for vehicles and equipment, §68-140-307.

State aviation hall of fame, §4-1-326.

Transportation equity fund, commissioners' annual report, §67-6-408.

Transportation equity trust fund, §9-4-207.

Vehicles subject to confiscation transporting alcoholic beverages, §57-9-201.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state criminal statute prohibiting reckless operation of aircraft. 89 A.L.R.3d 893.

42-1-202. Reckless operation of aircraft unlawful — Definitions.

It is unlawful for any person to operate aircraft recklessly upon or over any area within the jurisdiction of this state.

For the purposes of this part, “recklessly” means either:

The operation of aircraft, other than helicopters, at a height above the ground level over which the aircraft is being operated less than five hundred feet (500'); provided, that such operation of aircraft in time of emergency, when landing or taking off from any landing area, or when engaged in crop dusting, or health and sanitation control, fire patrol, or when simulating landings over open areas under the supervision of a flying instructor, shall not be deemed to be reckless operation;

The exemption for low flying in connection with landing or taking off shall apply only within a radius of three (3) miles from the landing area from which the plane has taken off or upon which it is about to land;

“Emergency” includes any time when the atmospheric conditions are such that the ceiling is lower than seven hundred fifty feet (750') above the ground level; or when an aircraft is being operated with mechanical defects that did not exist or that were not apparent prior to the taking off of the aircraft; or at any other time when the safety of the pilot or any passenger requires abnormally low flight;

The stunting of an aircraft at a height above the ground level over which the aircraft is being operated less than one thousand five hundred feet (1,500'). “Stunting” includes the operation of any aircraft whether the ignition be cut off or not, the steep diving of any aircraft at an angle exceeding forty-five degrees (45°) from horizontal, the looping of any aircraft, the spinning of any aircraft, the sharp turning of any aircraft in horizontal flight when the plane is banked at an angle exceeding sixty degrees (60°) from the horizontal, the slow rolling of any aircraft, the snap rolling of any aircraft, or other acrobatics, or when any aircraft is operated not in conformance with normal flight; or

The operation of any aircraft in such a manner as to unnecessarily endanger the life of any person, either within or without the aircraft.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.2 (Williams, § 2726.63); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-113.

Collateral References.

Flight of aircraft as nuisance. 79 A.L.R.3d 253.

Validity, construction, and application of state criminal statute prohibiting reckless operation of aircraft. 89 A.L.R.3d 893.

42-1-203. Testing of persons arrested for violating § 42-1-201.

Any person who operates or attempts to operate, or acts or attempts to act, as a crewmember of any aircraft in this state and who is arrested for a violation of § 42-1-201 is considered to have given consent to one (1) or more tests of the crewmember's blood, breath and urine, or combination thereof, for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or the presence of a substance that affects the crewmember's faculties in any way contrary to safety.

Testing for alcohol concentration or other substances shall be done in the same manner and by the same people as set out in § 55-10-406, and the defendant shall have the same rights as provided by § 55-10-406 with regard to refusing to take the test.

Refusing to take a test pursuant to subsection (a) after having been requested to do so and advised of the consequences of refusal is a Class B misdemeanor with a minimum period of imprisonment of forty-eight (48) hours.

A conviction for a violation of § 42-1-201 shall not bar a conviction for refusal to take tests for alcohol or other substances pursuant to this section. A conviction for refusal to take tests for alcohol or other substances pursuant to this section shall not be a bar to a conviction for a violation of § 42-1-201.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.3 (Williams, § 2726.64); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 1994, ch. 797, § 2; 2013, ch. 154, §§ 46, 47.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, in (b), substituted the first occurrence of “§55-10-406” for “§55-10-406(a)(1)” and substituted the second occurrence of “§ 55-10-406” for “§55-10-406(a)(2)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 154, § 57. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

42-1-204. Penalty for violating other provisions.

Any person violating any provision of this part other than the provisions of §§ 42-1-201 and 42-1-203 commits a Class A misdemeanor.

For any violation of § 42-1-202, in addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided in subsection (a), or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence that may be imposed pursuant thereto, the court in its discretion may prohibit the violator from operating an aircraft within the state for such period as it may determine, but not to exceed one (1) year. A violation of the duly imposed prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under § 42-2-105 or as a contempt of court.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.4 (Williams, § 2726.65); Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 1994, ch. 797, §§ 5, 6.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

42-1-205. Clerk to send copy of conviction to department of transportation.

It is the duty of the clerk in any court in which the operator of an aircraft is convicted of a violation of this part to send a certified copy of the judgment to the department of transportation, the cost of the copy to be added to the costs of the criminal cause. The clerk shall include in the information sent to the department the results of any tests for alcohol or other substances that were conducted in connection with the conduct resulting in the conviction.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.5 (Williams, § 2726.66); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 374; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-116; Acts 1994, ch. 797, § 3.

42-1-206. Department to advise federal officials of conviction.

It is the duty of the department of transportation to advise the officials of the federal government charged with the licensing of pilots of an aircraft whenever there has been a conviction of any person under this part, and it is further the duty of the department to petition the proper officials of the federal government to suspend the license of any pilot convicted of violating this part and to cooperate with the federal licensing officials in whatever investigation they may make in connection with any suspension hearing.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.6 (Williams, § 2726.67); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 374; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-117.

42-1-207. Armed forces and air shows excepted.

The prohibitions of this part relating to reckless operation of aircraft shall not apply to:

Members of the armed forces of the United States, including the flying squadrons of the Tennessee national guard, when engaged in operating aircraft in the course of military or naval flight training requiring the type of flying defined in this part as reckless; or

Air show participants who have received prior permit and approval from the department of transportation, whenever the participants are flying within the limits set out in the permit.

Acts 1947, ch. 132, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.7 (Williams, § 2726.68); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 374; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-118.

Cross-References. “Reckless” defined, §42-1-202.

42-1-208. Reports of arrests under § 42-1-201 or § 42-1-203.

Within thirty (30) days of an arrest being made for a violation of §42-1-201 or §42-1-203, the arresting law enforcement agency shall report the filing of charges, the results of any tests for alcohol or other substances that were conducted and the results of the trial or other subsequent proceeding, if known within that time period, to the division, branch or office of the federal aviation administration having jurisdiction for the regulation and certification of crewmembers or airplanes in the area of the agency. Law enforcement agencies possessing evidence of a violation of §42-1-201 or §42-1-203 shall present the evidence for use by the federal aviation administration as well as for prosecution by the state under this section.

Acts 1994, ch. 797, § 4.